Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,131
Subscriber; receive evidence of coverage; contents.

Every subscriber shall receive an evidence of coverage from the group contract holder or the health maintenance organization. The evidence of coverage shall not contain provisions or statements which are unfair, unjust, inequitable, misleading, or deceptive or which encourage misrepresentation as described by section 44-1525. The evidence of coverage shall contain a clear statement of the provisions required in subdivisions (1) through (17) of section 44-32,129.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 40.